Georgia, session 2025_26, HB314.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF GEORGIA:
SECTION 1.
Chapter 5 of Title 43 of the Official Code of Georgia Annotated, relating to athletic trainers,
is amended by revising Code Section 43-5-1, relating to definitions, as follows:
"43-5-1.
As used in this chapter, the term:
(1) 'Athletic injury' means any injury condition sustained by a person as a result of such
person's participation in exercises, sports, games, or recreational activities, or any
activities requiring physical strength, agility, flexibility, range of motion, speed, or
stamina without respect to where or how the injury condition occurs. Nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to expand the scope of practice of an athletic trainer beyond
H. B. 314
- 1 -

LC 46 1045
the determination of the advising and consenting physician as provided for in
paragraph (2) of this Code section.
(2) 'Athletic trainer' means a person with specific qualifications, as set forth in Code
Sections 43-5-7 and 43-5-8 who, upon the advice and consent of a physician, carries out
the practice of prevention, recognition, evaluation, management, disposition, treatment,
or rehabilitation of athletic injuries; and, in carrying out these functions, the athletic
trainer is authorized to use physical modalities, such as heat, light, sound, cold,
electricity, or mechanical devices related to prevention, recognition, evaluation,
management, disposition, rehabilitation, and treatment. Nothing in this Code section
shall be construed to require licensure of elementary or secondary school teachers,
coaches, or authorized volunteers who do not hold themselves out to the public as athletic
trainers. Athletic trainers who perform dry needling procedures are required to
demonstrate proof of graduation from a program of study that included dry needling
instruction consisting of a minimum of 50 hours and a competency assessment of
achievement in its curriculum. Online study for dry needling instruction will not be
accepted as a demonstration of competence and training.
(3) 'Board' means the Georgia Board of Athletic Trainers."
SECTION 2.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-5-6, relating to general powers
and duties of the Georgia Board for Athletic Trainers, as follows:
"43-5-6.
(a) The board is authorized to promulgate and adopt rules and regulations consistent with
this chapter which are necessary for the performance of its duties.
(b) The board shall prescribe application forms for license applications.
(c) The board shall establish guidelines for athletic trainers in the state and prepare and
conduct an approve a certification examination for applicants for a license.
H. B. 314
- 2 -

LC 46 1045
(d) The board shall adopt an official seal and the form of a license certificate of suitable
design."
SECTION 3.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-5-7, relating to license
requirement for persons engaged as athletic trainers, as follows:
"43-5-7.
No person shall hold himself or herself out as an athletic trainer or perform the services of
an athletic trainer, as defined in this chapter, without first obtaining a license under this
chapter. Nothing; provided, however, that nothing in this chapter shall be construed to
prevent any person enrolled in an accredited athletic training educational program
recognized by the board from serving as a student-trainer, assistant-trainer, or any similar
position an athletic training student if such service is not primarily for compensation
following the accredited program's standards for clinical education and is carried out under
the direct supervision of a physician or a licensed athletic trainer. As used in this Code
section, the term 'direct supervision' means that the supervising athletic trainer or physician
is physically present in the facility where athletic training students assisting with athletic
training services are located and is immediately available to assist the person being
supervised."
SECTION 4.
Said chapter is further amended by revising Code Section 43-5-8, relating to qualifications
of applicants and reciprocity, as follows:
"43-5-8.
(a) An applicant for an athletic trainer's license must have met the athletic training
curriculum requirements of a college or university approved shall be a graduate of an
accredited educational program that prepares athletic trainers recognized by the board and
H. B. 314
- 3 -

LC 46 1045
give proof of graduation or shall submit, in a manner prescribed by the board, equivalent
educational credentials as approved by the board.
(b) The board shall be authorized to grant a license, without examination, to any qualified
athletic trainer holding a license in another state if such other state recognizes licensees of
this state in the same manner.
(c) The board may grant a license without examination to any qualified applicant who
holds a certification from the National Athletic Trainers Board of Certification Board of
Certification for the Athletic Trainer or its successor.
(d) Any person who was issued a license prior to July 1, 2004, shall remain qualified for
licensure, notwithstanding the requirement for proof of graduation in subsection (a) of this
Code section, so long as the license remains current."
SECTION 5.
All laws and parts of laws in conflict with this Act are repealed.
H. B. 314
- 4 -